Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2184.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:1234567891011121314151617 * * *"Public interest." Factors used to determine public interest by the commission under section 531 (relating to public interest)."PUBLIC INTEREST." THE PUBLIC INTEREST STANDARD, AS DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 531 (RELATING TO PUBLIC INTEREST), IN A PROCEEDING UNDER SECTION 531, 1301 (RELATING TO RATES TO BE JUST AND REASONABLE), 1308 (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES) OR 1309 (RELATING TO RATES FIXED ON COMPLAINT; INVESTIGATION OF COSTS OF PRODUCTION). IN ANOTHER PROCEEDING, THE TERM HAS THE MEANING OTHERWISE APPLICABLE UNDER THIS TITLE AND COMMISSION AND JUDICIAL PRECEDENT.* * *Section 2. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 531. Public interest.(a) Public interest findings.--When making a decision regarding a utility, the commission shall use the following to determine whether the decision is in the public interest:(1) The affordability of utility rates for current and future residential customers.(2) The utility's plans for use of an all-of-the-above energy strategy, including:(i) development of distributed generation resources;(ii) development of renewable energy and storage resources;(iii) generation resources with little or no volatility in fuel prices; and(iv) demand-side resources, including energy efficiency, to insulate customers from future rate increases and bill increases.20260HB2184PN3673 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Modernization and improvement of the reliability of Pennsylvania's electric grid, if applicable, including both the transmission and distribution grid.(4) Protection of public health and the environment, including reduction of air emissions, water withdrawals, water consumption and water discharges.(5) The potential for economic growth, including:(i) jobs;(ii) economic output; and(iii) State and local tax revenues.(6) Improvement of utility reliability and resiliency.(7) Improvements in energy efficiency.(8) Environmental justice considerations.(b) Documentation.--The commission shall include public interest findings under subsection (a) in all decisions relating to public utilities.§ 531. PUBLIC INTEREST.(A) APPLICATION.--(1) THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PROCEEDINGS:(I) A RATE PROCEEDING UNDER SECTION 1301 (RELATING TO RATES TO BE JUST AND REASONABLE), 1308 (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES) OR 1309 (RELATING TO RATES FIXED ON COMPLAINT; INVESTIGATION OF COSTS OF PRODUCTION).(II) A MAJOR INFRASTRUCTURE APPROVAL PROCEEDING IN WHICH THE TOTAL CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROPOSED EXCEEDS $50,000,000 OR IN WHICH 10,000 OR MORE RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS MAY BE AFFECTED.(III) ANOTHER PROCEEDING IN WHICH THE COMMISSION 20260HB2184PN3673 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DETERMINES THAT PUBLIC INTEREST FINDINGS UNDER THIS SECTION ARE MATERIAL TO THE OUTCOME.(2) IN A PROCEEDING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROCEEDING IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST BY CONSIDERING THE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B), (C), (D) AND (E), AS APPLICABLE.(3) IF A PROCEEDING INVOLVES MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF PUBLIC UTILITY SERVICE, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE FACTORS APPLICABLE TO EACH TYPE OF SERVICE.(B) ELECTRIC SERVICE.--WHEN MAKING A DECISION REGARDING A PUBLIC UTILITY FURNISHING ELECTRIC SERVICE, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS, AS APPLICABLE, TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DECISION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST:(1) THE AFFORDABILITY OF ELECTRIC SERVICE RATES FOR CURRENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.(2) THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S PLAN FOR A COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY GENERATION, STORAGE AND DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGY THAT EMPHASIZES THE FOLLOWING:(I) DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED GENERATION RESOURCES.(II) DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY AND STORAGE RESOURCES.(III) GENERATION RESOURCES WITH LITTLE OR NO VOLATILITY IN FUEL PRICES.(IV) DEMAND-SIDE RESOURCES, INCLUDING ENERGY EFFICIENCY, TO INSULATE CUSTOMERS FROM FUTURE RATE INCREASES AND BILL INCREASES.(3) MODERNIZATION AND IMPROVEMENT OF THE RELIABILITY OF THE ELECTRIC GRID IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING THE TRANSMISSION GRID AND DISTRIBUTION GRID.(4) PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT, 20260HB2184PN3673 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INCLUDING REDUCTION OF AIR EMISSIONS, WATER WITHDRAWALS, WATER CONSUMPTION AND WATER DISCHARGES.(5) THE POTENTIAL FOR ECONOMIC GROWTH, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING:(I) JOBS.(II) ECONOMIC OUTPUT.(III) STATE AND LOCAL TAX REVENUES.(6) THE ABILITY OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO DELIVER SERVICE CONSISTENTLY, SAFELY, EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO RESPOND TO AND RECOVER FROM ADVERSE CIRCUMSTANCES.(7) IMPROVEMENTS IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY.(8) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS, INCLUDING WHETHER THE DECISION WILL CREATE OR EXACERBATE DISPROPORTIONATE ENVIRONMENTAL OR ECONOMIC BURDENS ON LOW-INCOME COMMUNITIES, COMMUNITIES OF COLOR OR COMMUNITIES IDENTIFIED AS OVERBURDENED UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION'S ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE MAPPING TOOL, THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S EJSCREEN TOOL OR A SUCCESSOR MAPPING TOOL DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION.(9) THE SAFETY OF ELECTRIC SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE, OPERATIONS AND SERVICE DELIVERY, INCLUDING THE PROTECTION OF CUSTOMERS, WORKERS AND THE PUBLIC FROM HARM ARISING FROM ELECTRIC SERVICE FACILITIES OR OPERATIONS.(C) WATER AND WASTEWATER SERVICE.--WHEN MAKING A DECISION REGARDING A PUBLIC UTILITY FURNISHING WATER SERVICE OR WASTEWATER SERVICE, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS, AS APPLICABLE, TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DECISION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST:20260HB2184PN3673 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE AFFORDABILITY OF WATER SERVICE RATES AND WASTEWATER SERVICE RATES FOR CURRENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.(2) THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S PLAN FOR A COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY GENERATION, STORAGE AND DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGY THAT EMPHASIZES THE FOLLOWING:(I) DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED GENERATION RESOURCES.(II) DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY AND STORAGE RESOURCES.(III) GENERATION RESOURCES WITH LITTLE OR NO VOLATILITY IN FUEL PRICES.(IV) DEMAND-SIDE RESOURCES, INCLUDING ENERGY EFFICIENCY, TO INSULATE CUSTOMERS FROM FUTURE RATE INCREASES AND BILL INCREASES.(3) MODERNIZATION AND IMPROVEMENT OF THE RELIABILITY OF WATER SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE AND WASTEWATER SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING WATER SUPPLY, WATER TREATMENT, WATER DISTRIBUTION, WASTEWATER COLLECTION, WASTEWATER TREATMENT AND WASTEWATER DISPOSAL INFRASTRUCTURE.(4) PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING REDUCTION OF AIR EMISSIONS, WATER WITHDRAWALS, WATER CONSUMPTION AND WATER DISCHARGES.(5) THE POTENTIAL FOR ECONOMIC GROWTH, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING:(I) JOBS.(II) ECONOMIC OUTPUT.(III) STATE AND LOCAL TAX REVENUES.(6) THE ABILITY OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO DELIVER SERVICE CONSISTENTLY, SAFELY, EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO RESPOND TO AND RECOVER FROM ADVERSE 20260HB2184PN3673 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CIRCUMSTANCES.(7) IMPROVEMENTS IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY.(8) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS, INCLUDING WHETHER THE DECISION WILL CREATE OR EXACERBATE DISPROPORTIONATE ENVIRONMENTAL OR ECONOMIC BURDENS ON LOW-INCOME COMMUNITIES, COMMUNITIES OF COLOR OR COMMUNITIES IDENTIFIED AS OVERBURDENED UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION'S ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE MAPPING TOOL, THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S EJSCREEN TOOL OR A SUCCESSOR MAPPING TOOL DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION.(9) THE SAFETY OF WATER SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE, WASTEWATER SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE, OPERATIONS AND SERVICE DELIVERY, INCLUDING THE PROTECTION OF CUSTOMERS, WORKERS AND THE PUBLIC FROM HARM ARISING FROM WATER SERVICE FACILITIES, WASTEWATER SERVICE FACILITIES OR OPERATIONS.(D) NATURAL GAS SERVICE.--WHEN MAKING A DECISION REGARDING A PUBLIC UTILITY FURNISHING NATURAL GAS SERVICE, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS, AS APPLICABLE, TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DECISION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST:(1) THE AFFORDABILITY OF NATURAL GAS SERVICE RATES FOR CURRENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.(2) THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S PLAN FOR A COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY GENERATION, STORAGE AND DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGY THAT EMPHASIZES THE FOLLOWING:(I) DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED GENERATION RESOURCES.(II) DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY AND STORAGE RESOURCES.(III) GENERATION RESOURCES WITH LITTLE OR NO VOLATILITY IN FUEL PRICES.20260HB2184PN3673 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (IV) DEMAND-SIDE RESOURCES, INCLUDING ENERGY EFFICIENCY RELATED TO NATURAL GAS SERVICE, TO INSULATE CUSTOMERS FROM FUTURE RATE INCREASES AND BILL INCREASES.(3) MODERNIZATION AND IMPROVEMENT OF THE RELIABILITY OF NATURAL GAS SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING NATURAL GAS DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE AND TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE.(4) PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING REDUCTION OF AIR EMISSIONS, WATER WITHDRAWALS, WATER CONSUMPTION AND WATER DISCHARGES.(5) THE POTENTIAL FOR ECONOMIC GROWTH, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING:(I) JOBS.(II) ECONOMIC OUTPUT.(III) STATE AND LOCAL TAX REVENUES.(6) THE ABILITY OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO DELIVER SERVICE CONSISTENTLY, SAFELY, EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO RESPOND TO AND RECOVER FROM ADVERSE CIRCUMSTANCES.(7) IMPROVEMENTS IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY.(8) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS, INCLUDING WHETHER THE DECISION WILL CREATE OR EXACERBATE DISPROPORTIONATE ENVIRONMENTAL OR ECONOMIC BURDENS ON LOW-INCOME COMMUNITIES, COMMUNITIES OF COLOR OR COMMUNITIES IDENTIFIED AS OVERBURDENED UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION'S ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE MAPPING TOOL, THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S EJSCREEN TOOL OR A SUCCESSOR MAPPING TOOL DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION.(9) THE SAFETY OF NATURAL GAS SERVICE INFRASTRUCTURE, 20260HB2184PN3673 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OPERATIONS AND SERVICE DELIVERY, INCLUDING THE PROTECTION OF CUSTOMERS, WORKERS AND THE PUBLIC FROM HARM ARISING FROM NATURAL GAS SERVICE FACILITIES OR OPERATIONS.(E) TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE AND OTHER PUBLIC UTILITY SERVICE.--WHEN MAKING A DECISION REGARDING A PUBLIC UTILITY FURNISHING TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE OR ANOTHER PUBLIC UTILITY SERVICE NOT COVERED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), (C) OR (D), THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS, AS APPLICABLE, TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DECISION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST:(1) THE AFFORDABILITY OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S RATES FOR CURRENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.(2) THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S PLAN FOR A COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY GENERATION, STORAGE AND DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGY THAT EMPHASIZES THE FOLLOWING:(I) DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED GENERATION RESOURCES.(II) DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY AND STORAGE RESOURCES.(III) GENERATION RESOURCES WITH LITTLE OR NO VOLATILITY IN FUEL PRICES.(IV) DEMAND-SIDE RESOURCES, INCLUDING ENERGY EFFICIENCY, TO INSULATE CUSTOMERS FROM FUTURE RATE INCREASES AND BILL INCREASES.(3) MODERNIZATION AND IMPROVEMENT OF THE RELIABILITY OF PUBLIC UTILITY INFRASTRUCTURE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(4) PROTECTION OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT.(5) THE POTENTIAL FOR ECONOMIC GROWTH, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING:(I) JOBS.(II) ECONOMIC OUTPUT.(III) STATE AND LOCAL TAX REVENUES.20260HB2184PN3673 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) THE ABILITY OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY TO DELIVER SERVICE CONSISTENTLY, SAFELY, EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO RESPOND TO AND RECOVER FROM ADVERSE CIRCUMSTANCES.(7) IMPROVEMENTS IN ENERGY EFFICIENCY.(8) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS, AS EVIDENCED BY THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S COMPLIANCE WITH STANDARDS ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION UNDER THE AIR POLLUTION CONTROL ACT, THE CLEAN STREAMS LAW, THE PENNSYLVANIA SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT OR ANOTHER APPLICABLE ENVIRONMENTAL STATUTE. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT MAKE AN INDEPENDENT DETERMINATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL COMPLIANCE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH BUT MAY CONSIDER THE PUBLIC UTILITY'S DEMONSTRATED COMPLIANCE WITH STANDARDS ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AND ANY PENDING ENFORCEMENT ACTION OR CONSENT ORDER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.(9) THE SAFETY OF PUBLIC UTILITY INFRASTRUCTURE, OPERATIONS AND SERVICE DELIVERY, INCLUDING THE PROTECTION OF CUSTOMERS, WORKERS AND THE PUBLIC FROM HARM ARISING FROM PUBLIC UTILITY FACILITIES OR OPERATIONS.(F) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE REGULATIONS.--WITHIN 18 MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING A METHODOLOGY FOR APPLYING THE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B)(8), (C)(8), (D)(8) AND (E)(8), INCLUDING THE DESIGNATION OF A SUCCESSOR MAPPING TOOL IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A SUCCESSOR MAPPING TOOL IS NECESSARY.(G) BALANCING FACTORS.--(1) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT TWO OR MORE 20260HB2184PN3673 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPLICABLE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTION (B), (C), (D) OR (E) ARE IN TENSION, THE COMMISSION SHALL TAKE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(I) IDENTIFY EACH FACTOR IMPLICATED BY THE DECISION AND EXPLAIN HOW THE FACTOR APPLIES TO THE PROCEEDING.(II) DOCUMENT THE SPECIFIC TENSION BETWEEN THE IMPLICATED FACTORS AND EXPLAIN WHY THE FACTORS CANNOT BE SIMULTANEOUSLY SATISFIED.(III) EXPLAIN THE WEIGHT THAT THE COMMISSION ASSIGNED TO EACH IMPLICATED FACTOR AND THE REASON FOR THE WEIGHT ASSIGNED, INCLUDING ANY EVIDENCE IN THE RECORD THAT INFORMED THE COMMISSION'S DETERMINATION.(IV) IDENTIFY ANY CONDITION, MITIGATION MEASURE, PHASED IMPLEMENTATION OR ALTERNATIVE APPROACH THAT THE COMMISSION CONSIDERED IN ATTEMPTING TO SATISFY THE IMPLICATED FACTORS.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ESTABLISH A FIXED HIERARCHY AMONG THE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTION (B), (C), (D) OR (E). THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE FULL CONSIDERATION TO EACH APPLICABLE FACTOR IN EACH APPLICABLE PROCEEDING.(3) THE COMMISSION'S DISCRETION IN WEIGHING THE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTION (B), (C), (D) OR (E) SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REVIEW FOR REASONABLENESS.(4) IF TWO OR MORE FACTORS ARE IN CONFLICT, THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE PARTICULAR WEIGHT TO FACTORS AFFECTING THE AFFORDABILITY OF UTILITY SERVICE FOR LOW-INCOME RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS AND FACTORS AFFECTING COMMUNITIES WITH EXISTING ENVIRONMENTAL OR PUBLIC HEALTH BURDENS, AS IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(8), (C)(8), (D)(8) OR (E)(8). 20260HB2184PN3673 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO SUBORDINATE ANOTHER FACTOR BUT SHALL SERVE AS A TIEBREAKER IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IMPLICATED FACTORS ARE OTHERWISE IN EQUIPOISE.(H) BALANCING RATE STANDARDS.--(1) IF THE APPLICATION OF THE FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTION (B), (C), (D) OR (E) APPEARS TO CONFLICT WITH THE JUST AND REASONABLE STANDARD UNDER SECTION 1301 OR ANOTHER APPLICABLE RATE STANDARD UNDER THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL TAKE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(I) DOCUMENT THE SPECIFIC TENSION BETWEEN THE STANDARDS IN THE COMMISSION'S DECISION.(II) EXPLAIN THE WEIGHT THAT THE COMMISSION ASSIGNED TO EACH STANDARD AND THE REASON FOR THE WEIGHT ASSIGNED.(III) IDENTIFY ANY REMEDIAL CONDITION, PHASED IMPLEMENTATION OR ALTERNATIVE APPROACH THAT THE COMMISSION CONSIDERED IN ATTEMPTING TO SATISFY BOTH STANDARDS.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE A HIERARCHY BETWEEN THE PUBLIC INTEREST STANDARD AND THE JUST AND REASONABLE STANDARD. THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE FULL CONSIDERATION TO BOTH STANDARDS IN EACH APPLICABLE PROCEEDING.(I) PUBLIC INTEREST FINDINGS.--(1) IN A PROCEEDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE FULL PUBLIC INTEREST FINDINGS UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE COMMISSION'S DECISION.(2) THE PUBLIC INTEREST FINDINGS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL IDENTIFY THE PUBLIC INTEREST FACTORS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B), (C), (D) AND (E) THAT ARE MATERIALLY IMPLICATED BY THE 20260HB2184PN3673 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROCEEDING AND EXPLAIN THE COMMISSION'S REASONS FOR THE DETERMINATION.(3) IF APPLICABLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (G) AND (H) IN THE COMMISSION'S DECISION.(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO CONDUCT A FULL PUBLIC INTEREST ANALYSIS UNDER THIS SECTION IN A PROCEEDING THAT IS NOT SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (A)(1).(5) WITHIN 18 MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS CATEGORIZING PROCEEDING TYPES AND ESTABLISHING THE CORRESPONDING LEVEL OF PUBLIC INTEREST ANALYSIS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.Section 3. Sections 1301(a), 1308(a) and 1309(a) 1309 of Title 66 are amended to read:§ 1301. Rates to be just and reasonable.(a) Regulation.--Every rate made, demanded, or received by any public utility, or by any two or more public utilities jointly, shall be just and reasonable, consistent with the public interest and in conformity with regulations or orders of the commission. Only public utility service being furnished or rendered by a municipal corporation, or by the operating agencies of any municipal corporation, beyond its corporate limits, shall be subject to regulation and control by the commission as to rates, with the same force, and in like manner, as if such service were rendered by a public utility.* * *§ 1308. Voluntary changes in rates.(a) General rule.--Unless the commission otherwise orders, no public utility shall make any change in any existing and duly 20260HB2184PN3673 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established rate, except after 60 days notice to the commission, which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the rates then in force, how the changes proposed are consistent with the public interest and the time when the changed rates will go into effect. The public utility shall also give such notice of the proposed changes to other interested persons as the commission in its discretion may direct. Such notices regarding the proposed changes which are provided to the utility's customers shall be in plain understandable language as the commission shall prescribe. All proposed changes shall be shown by filing new tariffs, or supplements to existing tariffs filed and in force at the time. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes in rates, without requiring the 60 days notice, under such conditions as it may prescribe.* * *§ 1309. Rates fixed on complaint; investigation of costs of production.(a) General rule.--Whenever the commission, after reasonable notice and hearing, upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that the existing rates of any public utility for any service are unjust, unreasonable, inconsistent with the public interest, or in anywise in violation of any provision of law, the commission shall determine the just and reasonable rates, including maximum or minimum rates, to be thereafter observed and in force, and shall fix the same by order to be served upon the public utility, and such rates shall constitute the legal rates of the public utility until changed as provided in this part. Whenever a public utility does not itself produce or generate that which it distributes, transmits, or furnishes to the public for compensation, but obtains the same from another 20260HB2184PN3673 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 source, the commission shall have the power and authority to investigate the cost of such production or generation in any investigation of the reasonableness of the rates of such public utility.* * *(B) DEADLINE FOR DECISION.--BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF A [NINE-MONTH] 12-MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING ON THE DATE OF THE COMMISSION'S MOTION OR THE FILING OF A COMPLAINT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (A), A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SERVING IN ACCORDANCE WITH LAW, ACTING UNANIMOUSLY, SHALL MAKE A FINAL DECISION AND ORDER, SETTING FORTH ITS REASONS THEREFOR. IF SUCH AN ORDER HAS NOT BEEN MADE AT THE EXPIRATION OF SUCH [NINE-MONTH] 12-MONTH PERIOD AND THE MOTION OR COMPLAINT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (A) REQUESTED A REDUCTION IN RATES, A FINAL DECISION AND ORDER OF THE COMMISSION WHICH DETERMINES OR FIXES A RATE REDUCTION SHALL BE RETROACTIVE TO THE EXPIRATION OF SUCH [NINE-MONTH] 12-MONTH PERIOD, PROVIDED THAT NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE COMMISSION FROM SETTING TEMPORARY RATES PURSUANT TO SECTION 1310 (RELATING TO TEMPORARY RATES) PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF SUCH [NINE-MONTH] 12-MONTH PERIOD AND GIVING SUCH EFFECT TO THE SETTING OF TEMPORARY RATES AS IS OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY THIS TITLE. THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE 12-MONTH PERIOD FOR 90 DAYS FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN IN A PROCEEDING REQUIRING PUBLIC INTEREST FINDINGS UNDER SECTION 531 (RELATING TO PUBLIC INTEREST) IF THE COMMISSION ISSUES A WRITTEN ORDER STATING THE BASIS FOR THE EXTENSION AND IDENTIFYING THE SPECIFIC PUBLIC INTEREST FACTORS REQUIRING ADDITIONAL TIME. THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY ONLY WHEN THE REQUESTED REDUCTION IN RATES AFFECTS MORE THAN 5% OF THE CUSTOMERS AND AMOUNTS TO IN EXCESS OF 3% OF THE TOTAL GROSS ANNUAL INTRASTATE OPERATING 20260HB2184PN3673 - 15 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REVENUES OF THE PUBLIC UTILITY, PROVIDED THAT, IF THE PUBLIC UTILITY FURNISHES TWO OR MORE TYPES OF SERVICE, THE FOREGOING PERCENTAGES SHALL BE DETERMINED ONLY ON THE BASIS OF THE CUSTOMERS RECEIVING, AND THE REVENUES DERIVED FROM, THE TYPE OF SERVICE TO WHICH THE REQUESTED REDUCTION PERTAINS. THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO ANY PROCEEDING INVOLVING A CHANGE IN RATES PROPOSED BY A PUBLIC UTILITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 1307 (RELATING TO SLIDING SCALE OF RATES; ADJUSTMENTS) OR 1308 (RELATING TO VOLUNTARY CHANGES IN RATES).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2184PN3673 - 16 - 12345678910